California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 successor demonstration year, the hospital’s allowable costs incurred in providing those services, multiplied by the federal medical assistance percentage. These costs shall be determined, certified, and claimed in accordance with Sections 14166.8 and 14166.9. All Medicaid federal financial participation received by the state for the certified public expenditures of the hospital, or the governmental entity with which the hospital is affiliated, for inpatient hospital services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be paid to the hospital.

(b) With respect to each project year and successor demonstration year, each of the designated public hospitals shall receive an interim payment for each day of inpatient hospital services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries based upon claims filed by the hospital in accordance with the claiming process set forth in Division 3 (commencing with Section 50000) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.
 The interim per diem payment amount shall be based on estimated costs, which shall be derived from statistical data from the following sources and which shall be multiplied by the federal medical assistance percentage:

(1) For allowable costs reflected in the Medicare cost report, the cost report most recently audited by the hospital’s Medicare fiscal intermediary adjusted by a trend factor to reflect increased costs, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the demonstration project.

(2) For allowable costs not reflected in the Medicare cost report, each hospital shall provide hospital-specific cost data requested by the department. The department shall adjust the data by a trend factor as necessary to reflect project year allowable costs.

(c) Until the department commences making
 payments pursuant to subdivision (b), the department may continue to make fee-for-service, per diem payments to the designated public hospitals, pursuant to the selective provider contracting program in accordance with Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), for services rendered on and after July 1, 2005, for a period of 120 days following the award of this demonstration. Per diem payments shall be adjusted retroactively to the amounts determined under the payment methodology prescribed in this article.

(d) No later than April 1 following the end of the relevant reporting period for the project year or successor demonstration year, the department shall undertake an interim reconciliation of payments made pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, based on Medicare and other cost and statistical data submitted by the hospital for the year and shall adjust payments to the hospital accordingly.

(e) (1) The designated public hospitals shall receive supplemental reimbursement for the costs incurred for physician and nonphysician practitioner services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are patients of the hospital, to the extent that those services are not claimed as inpatient hospital services by the hospital and the costs of those services are not otherwise recognized under subdivision (a).

(2) Expenditures made by the designated public hospital, or a governmental entity with which it is affiliated, for the services identified in paragraph (1) shall be reduced by any payments received pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 51501) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. The remainder shall be certified by the appropriate public official and claimed by the department in accordance with Sections 14166.8 and 14166.9. These expenditures
 may include any of the following:

(A) Compensation to physicians or nonphysician practitioners pursuant to contracts with the designated public hospital.

(B) Salaries and related costs for employed physicians and nonphysician practitioners.

(C) The costs of interns, residents, and related teaching physician and supervision costs.

(D) Administrative costs associated with the services described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, including billing costs.

(3) Designated public hospitals shall receive federal funding based on the expenditures identified and certified in paragraph (2). All federal financial participation received by the department for the certified public expenditures
 identified in paragraph (2) shall be paid to the designated public hospital, or a governmental entity with which it is affiliated.

(4) To the extent that the supplemental reimbursement received under this subdivision relates to services provided to hospital inpatients, the reimbursement shall be applied in determining whether the designated public hospital has received full baseline payments for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.21.

(5) Supplemental reimbursement under this subdivision may be distributed as part of the interim payments under subdivision (b), on a per-visit basis, on a per-procedure basis, or on any other federally permissible basis.

(6) The department shall submit for federal approval, by September 30, 2005, a proposed amendment to the Medi-Cal state plan to implement this
 subdivision, retroactive to July 1, 2005, to the extent permitted by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. If necessary to obtain federal approval, the department may limit the application of this subdivision to costs determined allowable by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. If federal approval is not obtained, this subdivision shall not be implemented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 5.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.5.

(a) With respect to each project year through October 31, 2010, the director shall determine a baseline funding amount for each designated public hospital. A hospital’s baseline funding amount shall be an amount equal to the total amount paid to the hospital for inpatient hospital services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries during the 2004–05 fiscal year, including the following Medi-Cal payments, but
 excluding payments received under the Medi-Cal Specialty Mental Health Services Consolidation Program:

(1) Base payments under the selective provider contracting program as provided for under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(2) Emergency Services and Supplemental Payments Fund payments as provided for under Section 14085.6.

(3) Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund payments and Large Teaching Emphasis Hospital and Children’s Hospital Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund payments as provided for under Sections 14085.7 and 14085.8, respectively.

(4) Disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments as provided for under Section 14105.98.

(5) Administrative day payments as provided for under Section 51542 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The baseline funding amount for each designated public hospital shall reflect a reduction for the total amount of intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to Sections 14085.6, 14085.7, 14085.8, 14085.9, and 14163 for the 2004–05 state fiscal year by the designated public hospital, or the governmental entity with which it is affiliated.

(c) With respect to each project year beginning after the 2005–06 project year through October 31, 2010, the department shall determine an adjusted baseline funding amount for each designated public hospital to reflect any increase or decrease in volume. The adjustment for designated public hospitals shall be calculated as follows:

(1) Applying the
 cost-finding methodology approved under the demonstration project, and applying accounting and reporting practices consistent with those applied in paragraph (2), the department shall determine the total allowable costs incurred by the hospital, or the governmental entity with which it is affiliated, in rendering hospital services that would be recognized under the demonstration project to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the uninsured during the 2004–05 state fiscal year.

(2) Applying the cost-finding methodology approved under the demonstration project, and applying accounting and reporting practices consistent with those applied in paragraph (1), the department shall determine the total allowable costs incurred by the hospital, or the governmental entity with which it is affiliated, in rendering hospital services under the demonstration project to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the uninsured during the state fiscal year preceding the project year for
 which the volume adjustment is being calculated.

(3) The department shall:

(A) Calculate the difference between the amount determined under paragraph (1) and the amount determined under paragraph (2).

(B) Determine the percentage increase or decrease by dividing the difference in subparagraph (A) by the amount in paragraph (1).

(C) Apply the percentage determined in subparagraph (B) to that amount that results from the hospital’s baseline funding amount determined under subdivision (a) as adjusted by subdivision (b), except for the reduction for the amount of intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to Section 14163, minus the amount of disproportionate share hospital payments in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(4) The designated public hospital’s adjusted baseline for the project year is the amount determined for the hospital in subdivision (a) as adjusted by subdivision (b), plus the amount in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3).

(5) Notwithstanding paragraphs (3) and (4), when, as determined by the department, in consultation with the designated public hospital, there has been a material reduction in patient services at the designated public hospital during the project year, and the reduction has resulted in a diminution of access for Medi-Cal and uninsured patients and a related reduction in total costs at the designated public hospital of at least 20 percent, the department may utilize current or adjusted data that are reflective of the diminution of access, even if the data are not annual data, to determine the hospital’s adjusted baseline amount.

(d) The aggregate designated public hospital baseline funding amount for each project year through October 31, 2010, shall be the sum of all baseline funding amounts determined under subdivisions (a) and (b), as adjusted in subdivision (c), as appropriate, for all designated public hospitals.

(e) (1) If, with respect to any project year, the difference between the percentage adjustment in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of this section, computed in the aggregate for designated public hospitals, excluding the percentage adjustment for any designated public hospital that was not in operation for the full project year, is greater than five percentage points more than the aggregate percentage adjustment for private DSH hospitals determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 14166.13, then the aggregate
 percentage adjustment for designated public hospitals shall be reduced in the amount necessary to reduce the difference to five percentage points. The reduction required by the previous sentence shall be allocated among designated public hospitals pro rata based on the relationship between each hospital’s percentage determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of this section and the aggregate percentage for designated public hospitals.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department may apply the adjustments set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(f) The provisions of this section shall apply only with respect to the demonstration project term, and shall not apply with respect to the successor demonstration project term. All references to baseline funding amounts and adjusted baseline funding amounts with respect to designated public hospitals
 shall be disregarded for purposes of successor demonstration year determinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 6.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.6.

(a) For the 2005–06 project year and subsequent project years through October 31, 2010, each designated public hospital described in subdivision (c) of Section 14166.3 shall be eligible to receive an allocation of federal Medicaid funding from the applicable federal disproportionate share hospital allotment pursuant to this section. The department shall establish the allocations in a manner that
 maximizes federal Medicaid funding to the state during the term of the demonstration project, and shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following factors, taking into account all other payments to each hospital under this article:

(1) The optimal use of intergovernmental transfer-funded payments described in subdivision (d).

(2) Each hospital’s pro rata share of the applicable aggregate designated public hospital baseline funding amount described in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.5.

(3) That the allocation under this section, in combination with the federal share of certified public expenditures for Medicaid inpatient hospital services for the project year determined under subdivision (a) of Section 14166.4, any supplemental reimbursement for professional services rendered to hospital inpatients determined for
 the project year under subdivision (e) of Section 14166.4, and the distribution of safety net care pool funds from the Health Care Support Fund determined under subdivision (a) of Section 14166.7, shall not exceed the baseline funding amount or adjusted baseline funding amount, as appropriate, for the hospital.

(4) Minimizing the need to redistribute federal funds that are based on the certified public expenditures of designated public hospitals as described in subdivision (c).

(b) Each designated public hospital shall receive its allocation of federal disproportionate share hospital payments in one or both of the following forms:

(1) Distributions from the Demonstration Disproportionate Share Hospital Fund established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14166.9, consisting of federal funds claimed and received by
 the department, pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.9 based on designated public hospitals’ certified public expenditures up to 100 percent of uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs.

(2) Intergovernmental transfer-funded payments, as described in subdivision (d). For purposes of determining whether the hospital has received its allocation of federal disproportionate share hospital payments established under this section, only the federal share of intergovernmental transfer-funded payments shall be considered.

(c) The distributions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may be made to a designated public hospital independent of the amount of uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs certified as public expenditures by that hospital pursuant to Section 14166.8, provided that, in accordance with the Special Terms and
 Conditions for the demonstration project, the recipient hospital does not return any portion of the funds received to any unit of government, excluding amounts recovered by the state or federal government.

(d) Designated public hospitals that meet the requirement of Section 1396r-4(b)(1)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code regarding the Medicaid inpatient utilization rate or Section 1396r-4(b)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code regarding the low-income utilization rate, may receive intergovernmental transfer-funded disproportionate share hospital payments as follows:

(1) The department shall establish the amount of the hospital’s intergovernmental transfer-funded disproportionate share hospital payment. The total amount of that payment, consisting of the federal and nonfederal components, shall in no case exceed that amount equal to 75 percent of the hospital’s
 uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs of hospital services, determined in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project.

(2) A transfer amount shall be determined for each hospital that is subject to this subdivision, equal to the nonfederal share of the payment amount established for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (1). The transfer amount so determined shall be paid by the hospital, or the public entity with which the hospital is affiliated, and deposited into the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14163. The sources of funds utilized for the transfer amount shall not include impermissible provider taxes or donations as defined under Section 1396b(w) of Title 42 of the United States Code or other federal funds. For this purpose, federal funds do not include patient care revenue received as payment for services rendered under programs such as
 Medicare or Medicaid.

(3) The department shall pay the amounts established pursuant to paragraph (1) to each hospital using the transfer amounts deposited pursuant to paragraph (2) as the nonfederal share of those payments. The total intergovernmental transfer-funded payment amount, consisting of the federal and nonfederal share, paid to a hospital shall be retained by the hospital in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project.

(e) The total federal disproportionate share hospital funds allocated under this section to designated public hospitals with respect to each project year, in combination with the federal share of disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments made to nondesignated public hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.16 for the same project year, shall not exceed the applicable federal disproportionate share hospital
 allotment.

(f) (1) Each designated public hospital shall receive quarterly interim payments of its disproportionate share hospital allocation during the project year. The determinations set forth in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, shall be made on an interim basis prior to the start of each project year, except that, with respect to the 2005–06 project year, the interim determinations shall be made prior to January 1, 2006. The department shall use the same cost and statistical data used in determining the interim payments for Medi-Cal inpatient hospital services under Section 14166.4, and available payments and uncompensated and uninsured cost data, including data from the Medi-Cal paid claims file and the hospital’s books and records, for the corresponding period.

(2) Prior to the distribution of payments in accordance with paragraph (1) and with
 subdivision (g) to a designated public hospital that is part of a hospital system containing multiple designated public hospitals licensed to the same governmental entity, the department shall consult with the applicable governmental entity. The department shall implement any adjustments to the payment distributions for the hospitals in that hospital system as requested by the governmental entity if the net effect of the requested adjustments for those hospitals is zero. These payment redistributions shall recognize the level of care provided to Medi-Cal and uninsured patients and shall maintain the viability and effectiveness of the hospital system. The adjustments made pursuant to this paragraph with respect to an affected hospital shall be disregarded in the application of the limitations described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.7.

(g) No later than April 1 following the end of
 the relevant reporting period for the project year, the department shall undertake an interim reconciliation of payments based on Medicare and other cost, payment, and statistical data submitted by the hospital for the project year, and shall adjust payments to the hospital accordingly.

(h) Each designated public hospital shall receive its disproportionate share hospital allocation, as computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, subject to final audits of all applicable Medicare and other cost, payment, and statistical data for the project year.

(i) The provisions of this section shall apply only with respect to the demonstration project term, and shall not apply with respect to the successor demonstration project term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 7.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.61.

(a) For successor demonstration year 6 and subsequent successor demonstration years, each designated public hospital described in subdivision (c) of Section 14166.3 shall be eligible to receive an allocation of federal Medicaid funding from the applicable federal disproportionate share hospital allotment pursuant to this section. The department shall establish the allocations and claim the federal funding in a manner that maximizes federal Medicaid funding to the state during the term of the successor demonstration project, and shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following factors:

(1) The optimal use of intergovernmental transfer-funded payments described in subdivision (d).

(2) Minimizing the
 need to redistribute federal funds that are based on the certified public expenditures of designated public hospitals as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(b) Disproportionate share hospital allocations for designated public hospitals shall be determined for each successor demonstration year as set forth below. With respect to successor demonstration year 10, allocations shall be determined separately for each of the periods of July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and July 1, 2015, through October 31, 2015.

(1) The department shall determine the maximum federal disproportionate share hospital allotment that is available under this section for the successor demonstration year.

(2) An initial allocation shall be made to Kern Medical Center for the periods and in the amounts specified below:

(A) For successor demonstration year 6, the amount of eight million dollars ($8,000,000).

(B) For successor demonstration years 7 through 9, the amount of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000).

(C) For the period of July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, the amount of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000).

(D) For the period of July 1, 2015, through October 31, 2015, the amount of four million dollars ($4,000,000).

(3) Each designated public hospital shall be allocated an amount per hospital discharge as specified in this paragraph. The number of discharges per category occurring in the relevant period shall be derived from each hospital’s data as reported pursuant to Section 14166.8. The
 reported discharges shall relate to the same hospital services for which costs are calculated for purposes of this section.

(A) One thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) per hospital discharge with respect to an uninsured individual.

(B) Nine hundred dollars ($900) per hospital discharge with respect to an individual enrolled in the Low Income Health Program.

(C) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per hospital discharge with respect to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, excluding discharges for which Medicare payments were received.

(4) The remaining available federal disproportionate share hospital allotment, after the allocations are made pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3), shall be allocated to designated public hospitals as follows:

(A) The department shall calculate for each designated public hospital an initial DSH claiming ability amount. For the purposes of this article, the “initial DSH claiming ability amount” means the total sum of the hospital’s uncompensated Medi-Cal, Low Income Health Program, and uninsured costs of hospital services that are reported as eligible certified public expenditures for disproportionate share hospital payments pursuant to Section 14166.8. For hospitals described in subdivision (d), the total sum shall be multiplied by 175 percent.

(B) The remaining available federal disproportionate share hospital allotment shall be allocated pro rata among the designated public hospitals based upon each hospital’s initial DSH claiming ability amount as determined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(c) Each designated public hospital
 shall receive its allocation of federal disproportionate share hospital payments in one or both of the following forms:

(1) Distributions from the Demonstration Disproportionate Share Hospital Fund established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14166.9, consisting of federal funds claimed and received by the department, pursuant to clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.9 based on designated public hospitals’ certified public expenditures up to 100 percent of uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs. These distributions may be made to a designated public hospital independent of the amount of uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs certified as public expenditures by that hospital pursuant to Section 14166.8.

(2) Intergovernmental transfer-funded payments, as described in subdivision (d). For purposes of determining
 whether the hospital has received its allocation of federal disproportionate share hospital payments established under this section, only the federal share of intergovernmental transfer-funded payments shall be considered.

(d) Designated public hospitals that meet the requirements of Section 1396r-4(b)(1)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code regarding the Medicaid inpatient utilization rate or Section 1396r-4(b)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code regarding the low-income utilization rate, may receive intergovernmental transfer-funded disproportionate share hospital payments as follows:

(1) The department shall establish the amount of the hospital’s intergovernmental transfer-funded disproportionate share hospital payment. The total amount of that payment, consisting of the federal and nonfederal components, shall in no case exceed an amount equal to 75 percent of the
 hospital’s uncompensated Medi-Cal, Low Income Health Program, and uninsured costs of hospital services, determined in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project and the applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(2) A transfer amount shall be determined for each hospital that is subject to this subdivision, equal to the nonfederal share of the payment amount established for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (1). The transfer amount determined shall be paid by the hospital, or the public entity with which the hospital is affiliated, and deposited into the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14163. The sources of funds utilized for the transfer amount shall not include impermissible provider taxes or donations as defined under Section 1396b(w) of Title 42 of the United States Code or other federal funds. For this purpose, federal funds
 do not include delivery system reform incentive pool payments or patient care revenue received as payment for services rendered under programs such as designated state health programs, the Low Income Health Program, Medicare, or Medicaid.

(3) The department shall pay the amounts established pursuant to paragraph (1) to each hospital using the transfer amounts deposited pursuant to paragraph (2) as the nonfederal share of those payments.

(e) The total federal disproportionate share hospital funds allocated under this section to designated public hospitals with respect to each successor demonstration year, in combination with the federal share of disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments made to nondesignated public hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.16 and applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan for the same successor demonstration year, shall not exceed the
 applicable federal disproportionate share hospital allotment.

(f) (1) Each designated public hospital shall receive quarterly interim payments of its disproportionate share hospital allocation during the successor demonstration year, except that, with respect to the period of July 1, 2015, through October 31, 2015, the interim payment shall be made in October 2015. The determinations set forth in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, shall be made on an interim basis prior to the start of each successor demonstration year. The department shall use the same cost and statistical data used in determining the interim payments for Medi-Cal inpatient hospital services under Section 14166.4, and available payments and uncompensated and uninsured cost data, including data from the Medi-Cal paid claims file and the hospital’s books and records, for the corresponding period.

(2) Prior to the
 distribution of payments in accordance with paragraph (1) and subdivisions (g) and (h) to a designated public hospital that is part of a hospital system containing multiple designated public hospitals licensed to the same governmental entity, the department shall consult with the applicable governmental entity. The department shall implement any adjustments to the payment distributions for the hospitals in that hospital system as requested by the governmental entity if the net effect of the requested adjustments for those hospitals is zero. These payment redistributions shall recognize the level of care provided to Medi-Cal and uninsured patients and shall maintain the viability and effectiveness of the hospital system.

(3) If the determinations pursuant to subdivision (g) or (h) for a successor demonstration year result in total federal disproportionate share hospital funds claimable for distribution to designated public hospitals under this
 section that, in combination with the federal share of disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments made to nondesignated public hospitals for the same successor demonstration year as described in subdivision (e), are less than the applicable federal disproportionate share hospital allotment, the department shall follow the steps described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive. For purposes of this paragraph, the determinations for successor demonstration year 10 shall be made for the period of July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015.

(A) The maximum available federal disproportionate share hospital funds for designated public hospitals for the successor demonstration year shall be determined by subtracting the federal share of disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments payable to nondesignated public hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.16 and applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan for the same successor demonstration
 year from the applicable federal disproportionate share hospital allotment.

(B) A reduction factor shall be calculated by dividing the total federal disproportionate share hospital funds that are claimable for distributions to designated public hospitals pursuant to subdivision (g) or (h), as applicable, by the maximum available federal disproportionate share hospital funds determined under subparagraph (A).

(C) The reduction factor calculated under subparagraph (B) shall be multiplied by the applicable allocation amount specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), by the applicable amount per discharge specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), and by the remaining available allotment otherwise allocable under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b). The total of these allocation amounts shall be incorporated as the payment distributions to be made pursuant to subdivision (g) or
 (h), as applicable.

(4) With respect to the period of July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, and notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 14184.30, if a final audit, reconciliation, or judicial or administrative determination is made or implemented subsequent to the applicable finalization date set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 14184.30 and results in federal disproportionate share hospital funds distributable to designated public hospitals in addition to the aggregate amount distributed pursuant to paragraph (3), the department shall proceed as follows:

(A) The department shall perform revised distribution calculations pursuant to subdivision (b) and, if applicable, paragraph (3).

(B) The amounts that would be allocated to each designated public hospital under the revised distribution
 calculations in subparagraph (A) shall be compared to the amounts previously distributed to the hospital for the same successor demonstration year.

(C) The additional federal disproportionate share hospital funds shall be distributed to those designated public hospitals to which additional amounts would be due under the revised distribution calculations.

(D) The timing of the adjustments under this paragraph shall be determined by the department in consultation with the affected designated public hospitals.

(E) Notwithstanding any other law, if the affiliated governmental entity for the designated public hospital is a county subject to Article 12 (commencing with Section 17612.1) of Chapter 6 of Part 5, the department, in consultation with the affected designated public hospital and the Department of Finance, shall
 determine how to account for whether any additional payment amount distributed to the designated public hospital pursuant to subparagraph (C) would otherwise have affected, if at all, the applicable county’s redirection obligation for the 2014–15 fiscal year pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17612.3 and shall determine which adjustments, if any, are necessary to either the repayment amount or the applicable county’s redirection obligation. For purposes of this subparagraph, subdivision (f) of Section 17612.2 of this code and paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 101853 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply.

(g) No later than April 1 following the end of the relevant reporting period for the successor demonstration year, the department shall undertake an interim reconciliation of payments based on Medicare and other cost, payment, discharge, and statistical data submitted by the hospital for the successor
 demonstration year, and shall adjust payments to the hospital accordingly.

(h) Each designated public hospital shall receive its disproportionate share hospital allocation, as computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, subject to final audits of all applicable Medicare and other cost, payment, discharge, and statistical data for the successor demonstration year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 60.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.7.

(a) (1) With respect to each project year through October 31, 2010, designated public hospitals, or governmental entities with which they are affiliated, shall be eligible to receive safety net care pool payments from the Health Care Support Fund established pursuant to Section 14166.21. The total amount of these payments, in combination with the federal share of certified public
 expenditures for Medicaid inpatient hospital services determined for the project year under subdivision (a) of Section 14166.4, any supplemental reimbursement for physician and nonphysician practitioner services rendered to hospital inpatients determined for the project year under subdivision (e) of Section 14166.4, and the federal disproportionate share hospital allocation determined under Section 14166.6, shall not exceed the hospital’s baseline funding amount or adjusted baseline funding amount, as appropriate.

(2) The department shall establish the amount of the safety net care pool payment described in paragraph (1) for each designated public hospital in a manner that maximizes federal Medicaid funding to the state during the term of the demonstration project.

(3) A safety net care pool payment amount may be paid to a designated public hospital, or governmental entity with
 which it is affiliated, pursuant to this section independent of the amount of uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs that is certified as public expenditures pursuant to Section 14166.8, provided that, in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project, the recipient hospital does not return any portion of the funds received to any unit of government, excluding amounts recovered by the state or federal government.

(4) In establishing the amount to be paid to each designated public hospital under this subdivision, the department shall minimize to the extent possible the redistribution of federal funds that are based on certified public expenditures as described in paragraph (3).

(b) (1) Each designated public hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, shall receive the amount established pursuant to
 subdivision (a) in quarterly interim payments during the project year. The determination of the interim payments shall be made on an interim basis prior to the start of each project year, except that, with respect to the 2005–06 project year, the determination of the interim payments shall be made prior to January 1, 2006. The department shall use the same cost and statistical data that is used in determining the interim payments for Medi-Cal inpatient hospital services under Section 14166.4 and for the disproportionate share hospital allocations under Section 14166.6, for the corresponding period.

(2) Prior to the distribution of payments in accordance with paragraph (1) and with subdivision (c) to a designated public hospital that is part of a hospital system containing multiple designated public hospitals licensed to the same governmental entity, the department shall consult with the applicable governmental entity. The department shall
 implement any adjustments to the payment distributions for the hospitals in that hospital system as requested by the governmental entity if the net effect of the requested adjustments for those hospitals is zero. These payment redistributions shall recognize the level of care provided to Medi-Cal and uninsured patients and shall maintain the viability and effectiveness of the hospital system. The adjustments made pursuant to this paragraph with respect to an affected hospital shall be disregarded in the application of the limitations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.6.

(c) (1) No later than April 1 following the end of the project year, the department shall undertake an interim reconciliation of the payment amount established pursuant to subdivision (a) for each designated public hospital using Medicare and other cost, payment, and statistical data
 submitted by the hospital for the project year, and shall adjust payments to the hospital accordingly.
